Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Municipal Zoning

13-7-201. Grant of power.

For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, morals, convenience, order, prosperity and general welfare, the board of aldermen, board of commissioners or other chief legislative body of any municipality by whatever title designated, and hereinafter designated as “chief legislative body”, is empowered, in accordance with the conditions and the procedure specified in this part and part 3 of this chapter, to regulate the location, height, bulk, number of stories and size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of the lot which may be occupied, the sizes of yards, courts and other open spaces, the density of population, and the uses of buildings, structures and land for trade, industry, residence, recreation, public activities and other purposes, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur. Special districts or zones may be established in those areas deemed subject to seasonal or periodic flooding, and such regulations may be applied therein as will minimize danger to life and property, and as will secure to the citizens of Tennessee the eligibility for flood insurance under Public Law 1016, 84th Congress or subsequent related laws or regulations promulgated thereunder. Protection and encouragement of access to sunlight for solar energy systems may be considered in promulgating zoning regulations pursuant to this section. Quarrying shall be uniformly defined, for purposes of all municipal zoning regulations, as the extraction, removal and mechanized processing of stone, gravel, phosphate rock, metallic ore, limestone, marble, chert, sand, dimension stone and any other solid mineral or substance of commercial value, except coal and deep metal mining, including, but not limited to zinc, found in natural deposits in the earth, for barter or sale. The definition of quarrying shall not include the reuse of these minerals on the same site from which they are extracted. This definition shall have no effect on the exception contained in § 54-1-128. The removal of borrow material from a site and the placement of the same material on a project site without mechanized processing shall not be considered quarrying.

The transfer of development rights may be provided for in the promulgation of zoning regulations pursuant to this section. The creation, amendment or repeal of any regulations, districts or maps providing for the transfer of development rights shall be in compliance with §§ 13-7-203 and 13-7-204. The transfer of development rights shall not be subject to taxation pursuant to title 67, chapter 4 or 6; provided, that any instruments recorded in the county register's office as the result of the transfer of development rights shall be subject to the fees set out in § 8-21-1001. Any regulations authorizing the transfer of development rights shall provide that conveyances of development rights shall be in writing and shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds and that whenever transferred development rights are allocated to any property, such allocation shall not become effective until the transferred development rights are noted in an instrument or on a plat and recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

A town, city, county, a county with a metropolitan form of government, the state, or a not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization may be the receiving entity of a development right without allocating or designating the transferred development right to any receiving property under its ownership or control. A town, city, county, a county with a metropolitan form of government, the state or a not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization shall be allowed to receive all or part of the donating property's development rights notwithstanding any local zoning regulations pertaining to any required ratio or amount of land area a receiving property must contain in relation to the land area of the donating property or of the total amount of density that a receiving property may obtain from the donating property.

Subdivision (a)(2) shall be strictly construed with the specific intent to allow a local government to establish its own plan whereby the owners of property in a restrictive area (historical, agricultural, or environmental) can sell the development rights to a developer or another individual and only with the consent of the property owner and through negotiations of development rights in the free marketplace. A property owner may donate, through gift or through testamentary disposition, all or part of the development rights of the owner's property to a town, city, county, a county with a metropolitan form of government, the state, or a not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization. Any town, city, county, county with a metropolitan government, the state, or any not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization may purchase development rights from a property owner with the consent of the property owner and the purchase shall be through negotiations of the development rights in the free marketplace. Any town, city, county, county with a metropolitan government, the state, or any not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization may preserve the purchased or donated development rights unused for a definite or indefinite period of time and may at any time sell the development rights so held to a property owner in a designated receiving area with the purchase being one negotiated in the free marketplace. In order to accept a donation of development rights or for the purchase or sale of developments rights by a town, city, county, or county with a metropolitan government, the donation, purchase or sale must be approved by that government's legislative body.

It is the legislative intent that the provisions of this section relative to the transfer of development rights are permissive and not mandatory. Such rights shall only be transferred by contract and not by operation of law.

In any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor greater than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chief legislative body of any municipality is further authorized and empowered to rezone properties conditionally or based upon contract, where the agreed conditions are designed to ameliorate injuries created by the rezoning to surrounding property interests or to municipal interests.

In any county having a population of not less than eighty-five thousand eight hundred (85,800) nor greater than eighty-six thousand one hundred (86,100), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, any municipality may, by ordinance or amendment adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, rezone properties conditionally or based upon contract, where the agreed conditions are designed to ameliorate injuries created by the rezoning to surrounding property interests or to municipal interests.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.1; Acts 1957, ch. 306, § 1; 1979, ch. 259, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-701; Acts 1984, ch. 952, § 1; 1987, ch. 361, §§ 2, 4; 2001, ch. 265, §§ 5-7; 2001, ch. 409, § 1; 2008, ch. 1150, § 14; 2011, ch. 217, § 2; 2012, ch. 755, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 1016, 84th Congress, was compiled in 42 U.S.C. §§ 2401-2421; however, these provisions were repealed by Pub. L. 90-488, § 1377, part of the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, which is presently compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 4001 et seq.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Airport zoning ordinance appeals, hearing by board, §§ 42-6-108, 42-6-109.

Borrow excavations, exemption of certain road work construction from local and regional zoning and planning regulations, § 54-1-128.

Establishment of foreign-trade zones, title 7, ch 85.

Local plans for street and highway systems, title 54, ch. 18, part 2.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Zoning classifications, residences of persons with disabilities, title 13, ch. 24, part 1.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 29; 26 Tenn. Juris., Zoning, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Growth and Its Implications: An Evaluation of Tennessee's Growth Management Plan, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 983 (2000).

Real Property — Zoning Ordinances — Validity, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 542.

Redefining Trademark Alteration Within the Context of Aesthetic-Based Zoning Laws: A Blockbuster Dilemma, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 717 (2000).

Sunny and Share: Balancing Airspace Entitlement Rights Between Solar Energy Adopters and Their Neighbors, 72 Vand. L. Rev. 1075 (April 2019).

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and appeals from rulings of board of zoning appeals, OAG 98-082, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (4/8/98).

Statutes which empower municipalities to regulate land use preclude the regulation of agricultural uses of land through zoning ordinances, OAG 08-184, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 229 (12/11/08).

Building permit and plan review fees for construction and/or renovation of a school located within the city limits; applicability of planning and zoning regulations of the city for school district-owned property located within city limits. OAG 10-27, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 22 (3/8/10).

An ordinance or regulation imposing a design standard is valid unless it violates any state statute or positive constitutional guaranty or unless it is “clearly arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, having no substantial relation to the public health, safety, or welfare.” Accordingly, whether any given ordinance or regulation requiring the observation of appearance-based residential building design standards for the construction of single family dwellings is valid is a fact-intensive inquiry, the answer to which will depend on the particular facts and circumstances related to the particular community. A given design standard may be reasonable in one community, but not in another. OAG 17-44, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS-44 (10/3/2017).

13-7-202. Zoning plan.

Whenever the planning commission of the municipality makes and certifies to the chief legislative body a zoning plan, including both the full text of a zoning ordinance and the maps, representing the recommendations of the planning commission for the regulation by districts or zones of the location, height, bulk, number of stories and size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of the lot which may be occupied, the size of yards, courts and other open spaces, the density of population, and the uses of buildings, structures and land for trade, industry, residence, recreation, public activities and other purposes, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur, then the chief legislative body may exercise the powers granted and for the purposes mentioned in § 13-7-201, and may divide the municipality into districts or zones of such number, shape and areas it may determine, and, for such purposes, may regulate the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration and uses of buildings and structures and the uses of land.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-702; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 15.

Attorney General Opinions. An ordinance or regulation imposing a design standard is valid unless it violates any state statute or positive constitutional guaranty or unless it is “clearly arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, having no substantial relation to the public health, safety, or welfare.” Accordingly, whether any given ordinance or regulation requiring the observation of appearance-based residential building design standards for the construction of single family dwellings is valid is a fact-intensive inquiry, the answer to which will depend on the particular facts and circumstances related to the particular community. A given design standard may be reasonable in one community, but not in another. OAG 17-44, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (10/3/2017).

13-7-203. Hearing on ordinance or amendment — Notice — Publication — Procedure.

Before enacting the zoning ordinance or any amendment thereof, the chief legislative body shall hold a public hearing thereon, at least fifteen (15) days' notice of the time and place of which shall be published in the official municipal journal or in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality.

No change in or departure from the text or maps as certified by the planning commission shall be made, unless such change or departure be first submitted to the planning commission and approved by it, or, if disapproved, shall receive the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the chief legislative body.

Notwithstanding the requirements of any municipality's charter to the contrary, the entire text of a comprehensive zoning ordinance need not be published in a newspaper. For those municipalities whose charters do require ordinances to be published in a newspaper, it shall be sufficient for the comprehensive zoning ordinance that its caption and a complete summary be published.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-703; Acts 1984, ch. 811, § 3.

Cross-References. Publication of ordinances, § 6-2-102.

13-7-204. Amendments to zoning ordinances.

The zoning ordinance, including the maps, may from time to time be amended; but no amendment shall become effective unless it is first submitted to and approved by the planning commission or, if disapproved, receives the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the chief legislative body.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-704.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 33; 26 Tenn. Juris., Zoning, § 9.

13-7-205. Board of appeals — Creation — Appointment of members — Terms — Rules governing organization —Training and continuing education.

The chief legislative body may create a board of zoning appeals of three (3), five (5), seven (7), or nine (9) members, may specify the mode of appointment of members of such board and their terms, which terms shall be of such length and so arranged that the term of one (1) member shall expire each year, or the chief legislative body may designate the planning commission of the municipality as the board of zoning appeals. The compensation of the members of the board shall be as affixed by the chief legislative body; provided, that in those counties having a metropolitan government the chief legislative body may create a board of three (3), five (5), seven (7), or nine (9) members, at least two (2) of whom shall be selected from minorities as well as members of the sex which historically have been under-represented on the board of zoning appeals, subject to this section. If a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than four hundred seventy thousand (470,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, creates a board of zoning appeals consisting of nine (9) members, at least two (2) of the members thereof shall be appointed consistent with this subsection (a).

In the county town of any county having a population of more than two hundred eighty thousand (280,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chief legislative body may create a board of zoning appeals of nine (9) members, and may specify the mode of appointment of members of such board and their terms. Such terms shall be of a length and so arranged that the term of one (1) member shall expire each year. This subdivision (a)(2) shall not apply to a county having a charter form of government or any county having a metropolitan form of government.

A municipality having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand eight hundred fifty (32,850) nor more than thirty-four thousand (34,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may increase its board of zoning appeals from five (5) members to seven (7) members, with the terms of such members being arranged in accordance with this subsection (a).

The chief legislative body may provide and specify, in its zoning or other ordinance, general rules to govern the organization and procedure and jurisdiction of the board of appeals, which rules shall not be inconsistent with this part and part 3 of this chapter, and the board of appeals may adopt supplemental rules of procedure, not inconsistent with this part and part 3 of this chapter or such general rules.

The supplemental rules of procedure may address, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Maintenance of a record of the board's resolutions, transactions, motions and actions, which shall be a public record;

Election from its membership of a chair and other officers as the board deems necessary; and

The inclusion of statements of reasons for the board's actions as part of each motion or action, including such findings of fact and statements of material evidence as the board may deem pertinent.

Each board of zoning appeals member shall, within one (1) year of initial appointment and each calendar year thereafter, attend a minimum of four (4) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (c)(5).

Each full-time or contract building commissioner or professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals shall, each calendar year, attend a minimum of eight (8) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (c)(5). A professional planner who is a member of the American Institute of Certified Planners (AICP) shall be exempt from this requirement.

Each of the individuals listed in subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) shall certify by December 31 of each calendar year such individual's attendance by a written statement filed with the secretary of such individual's respective board of zoning appeals. Each statement shall identify the date of each program attended, its subject matter, location, sponsors, and the time spent in each program.

The legislative body of the municipality shall be responsible for paying the training and continuing education course registration and travel expenses for each board of zoning appeals member and full-time building commissioner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals.

The subjects for the training and continuing education required by subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) shall include, but not be limited to, the following: land use planning; zoning; flood plain management; transportation; community facilities; ethics; public utilities; wireless telecommunications facilities; parliamentary procedure; public hearing procedure; land use law; natural resources and agricultural land conservation; economic development; housing; public buildings; land subdivision; and powers and duties of the board of zoning appeals. Other topics reasonably related to the duties of the board of zoning appeals and the building commissioner or other administrative officials whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals may be approved by majority vote of the board of zoning appeals prior to December 31 of the year for which credit is sought.

Each local board of zoning appeals shall keep in its official public record originals of all statements and the written documentation of attendance required to comply with these provisions for three (3) years after the calendar year in which each statement and appurtenant written documentation is filed.

Each board of zoning appeals member and each building commissioner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals shall be responsible for obtaining written documentation signed by a representative of the sponsor of any training and continuing education course for which credit is claimed, acknowledging the fact that the individual attended the program for which credit is claimed.

If a board of zoning appeals member fails to complete the requisite number of hours of training and continuing education within the time allotted by this subsection (c) or fails to file the statement required by this subsection (c), then this shall constitute a cause for the removal of the board of zoning appeals member from the board of zoning appeals.

The legislative body of the municipality may, at any time, opt out of this subsection (c) by passage of an ordinance. Further any such legislative body that has opted out may, at a later date, opt in by passage of an ordinance.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.5; Acts 1979, ch. 324, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-705; Acts 1988, ch. 845, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 721, § 1; 1999, ch. 78, § 1; 2002, ch. 862, § 6; 2009, ch. 47, § 11; 2011, ch. 279, § 2; 2016, ch. 693, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2002, ch. 862, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Planning Commission and Board of Zoning Appeals Training and Continuing Education Act of 2002.”

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and appeals from rulings of board of zoning appeals, OAG 98-082, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (4/8/98).

13-7-206. Jurisdiction of board — Parties to appeals.

The zoning ordinance may provide that the board of appeals may, in appropriate cases and subject to the principles, standards, rules, conditions and safeguards set forth in the ordinance, make special exceptions to the terms of the zoning regulations in harmony with their general purpose and intent. The chief legislative body may also authorize the board of appeals to interpret the zoning maps and pass upon disputed questions of lot lines or district boundary lines or similar questions as they arise in the administration of the zoning regulations.

Appeals to the board of appeals may be taken by any person aggrieved or by any officer, department, board or bureau of the municipality affected by any grant or refusal of a building permit or other act or decision of the building commissioner of the municipality or other administrative official based in whole or part upon this ordinance enacted under this part and part 3 of this chapter.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-706.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 34.

Law Reviews.

Extending Standing to Nonresidents — A Response to The Exclusionary Effects of Zoning Fragmentation (Kent H. McMahan), 24 Vand. L. Rev. 341.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and appeals from rulings of board of zoning appeals, OAG 98-082, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (4/8/98).

13-7-207. Powers of board of appeals.

The board of appeals has the power to:

Hear and decide appeals where it is alleged by the appellant that there is error in any order, requirement, permit, decision, or refusal made by the municipal building commissioner or any other administrative official in the carrying out or enforcement of any provision of any ordinance enacted pursuant to this part and part 3 of this chapter;

Hear and decide, in accordance with any such ordinance, requests for special exceptions or for interpretation of the map or for decisions upon other special questions upon which such board is authorized by any such ordinance to pass; and

Where, by reason of exceptional narrowness, shallowness or shape of a specific piece of property at the time of the enactment of the zoning regulation, or by reason of exceptional topographic conditions or other extraordinary and exceptional situation or condition of such piece of property, the strict application of any regulation enacted under this part and part 3 of this chapter would result in peculiar and exceptional practical difficulties to or exception or undue hardship upon the owner of such property, authorize, upon an appeal relating to the property, a variance from such strict application so as to relieve such difficulties or hardship; provided, that such relief may be granted without substantial detriment to the public good and without substantially impairing the intent and purpose of the zone plan and zoning ordinance.

Acts 1935, ch. 44, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-707.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 34.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and appeals from rulings of board of zoning appeals, OAG 98-082, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (4/8/98).